Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 3. Effectiveness

§ 17-23-301.
Reserved power of state to amend or repeal chapter.

All provisions of this chapter may be altered from time to time or repealed and all rights of statutory trusts, trustees, beneficial owners and other persons are subject to this reservation.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 17-23-302.
Construction and application of chapter and governing instrument.

The rule that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed shall have no application to this chapter.

It is the policy of this chapter to give maximum effect to the principle of freedom of contract and to the enforceability of governing instruments.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1.